Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1468
Dealer; acts prohibited.

A dealer shall not:

(1) Fail to perform predelivery inspection functions, as specified by the warrantor, in a competent and timely manner;

(2) Fail to perform warranty service that is authorized by a warrantor in a reasonably competent and timely manner on any transient customer's recreational vehicle if such recreational vehicle is the same line-make sold by the dealer. This subdivision does not apply if the dealer determines that the transient customer is acting in a manner detrimental to the dealer's business;

(3) Fail to track actual time expended to perform warranty service that is not governed by time allowances in the schedule of compensation;

(4) Claim an agency relationship with a warrantor or a manufacturer; or

(5) Misrepresent the terms of any warranty.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 27.
October 1, 2026